Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.160

County lands assessment fund created—List of lands to be furnished.

Upon request the county treasurer shall furnish to the county legislative authority a list of all lands owned by the county, together with the amounts levied as assessments and the district in or by which such assessments are levied, against each description of the lands, as it appears on the assessment roll of the district. On or before the first day of August of each year, upon request, the treasurer shall furnish to the county legislative authority a similar list of all land owned by the county and subject to any such assessments, together with the amounts of any installment of assessments falling due against any of such lands in the ensuing year and an estimate of any maintenance or other assessments to be made against same to fall due in the ensuing year.

[ 1991 c 245 s 9; 1963 c 4 s 36.33.160. Prior: 1929 c 193 s 5; RRS s 4027-5.]